Alaska statutes. Title 3. Agriculture, Animals, and Food.
Chapter 20. Agricultural and Industrial Program Support.

Collateral references. —

3 C.J.S., Agriculture, §§ 151-163.

Liability for injury inflicted by horse, dog, or other domestic animal exhibited at show. 80 ALR2d 886.

Validity and construction of contract exempting agricultural fair with similar bailee from liability for articles delivered for exhibition. 69 ALR3d 1025.